Utah statutes.
26-29-4.   Enforcement of chapter.

The responsibility for adoption of the planning and design criteria referred to in Section 26-29-3, and enforcement of this chapter shall be as follows:

(1)  where state school funds are utilized, the State Board of Education.

(2)  where state funds are utilized, the State Building Board.

(3)  where funds of political subdivisions are utilized, the governing board of the county or municipality in which the building or facility is located.

